Massachusetts, session 194th, H2551.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 111 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2021 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 242 the following section:-  

Section 243. (a) The department shall establish a registry of volunteer personnel (“the 
volunteer registry”) who are available to provide services, including but not limited to health and 
medical services. The department may establish requirements for membership in the volunteer 
registry including but not limited to verification of licensure and completion of training.  

of 3 8  (b) The department shall establish a process to identify and credential personnel in the 
volunteer registry, which may include a requirement for photographic identification and/or 
Criminal Offender Record Information as defined by section 167 of chapter 6.   
(c) The commissioner or his or her designee may activate some or all of the volunteers in 
the volunteer registry:  
(1) during an emergency detrimental to the public health declared by the governor under 
section 2A of chapter 17;   
(2) during a state of emergency declared by the governor under chapter 639 of the acts of 
1950, as amended;  
(3) during a public health incident that the commissioner determines demands an urgent 
response;  
(4) pursuant to a request from a local public health authority, healthcare facility, when 
local or regional resources have been or are expected to be exhausted, or  
(5) to conduct training and or exercises approved by the commissioner or his/her 
designee related to the volunteers’ ability to respond to potential activation under this subsection.   
For the purposes of this subsection, “local public health authority” shall mean any body 
politic or political subdivision of the commonwealth that acts as a board of health, public health 
commission, or health department for a city or town and shall include any board of health as 
defined in section 1 of chapter 111 and any regional board of health or regional health district as 
defined in section 27B of chapter 111. 

of 3 28  (d) In the absence of any other similar protections provided by law, whenever activated 
for duty by the commissioner or his or her designee in accordance with this section, members of 
the volunteer registry shall be construed to be employees of the commonwealth for the purposes 
of chapter 258 of the general laws. 
(e) In the absence of any other similar benefits provided by law, any member of the 
volunteer registry activated for duty by of the commissioner or his or her designee in accordance 
with this section who dies or who sustains disability or injury while so activated shall be 
construed to be an employee of the commonwealth and shall be compensated in like manner as 
state employees are compensated under the provisions of sections 69 through 75 of chapter 152 
of the general laws.  
(f) The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement this 
section.